District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.05

Jurisdiction.

(a)

A petition under this subchapter may be filed only in a court that has jurisdiction to make a child-custody determination with respect to the child at issue under §§ 16-4601.01 to 16-4604.02.

(b)

A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction under § 16-4602.04 if the court finds a credible risk of abduction.

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.